Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-249
Temporary custody; not an arrest; exception.

No juvenile taken into temporary custody under section 43-248 shall be considered to have been arrested, except for the purpose of determining the validity of such custody under the Constitution of Nebraska or the United States.

Laws 1981, LB 346, § 5;

Laws 1982, LB 787, § 3.